Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 8 Employment and Training of Peace Officers

Cross references.

Basic training courses for sheriffs, §

15-16-3

.

Campus policemen generally, §

20-3-72

and T. 20, C. 8.

Conservation rangers and deputy conservation rangers, §

27-1-16

et seq.

Furnishing a copy of psychological or psychiatric evaluation to law enforcement officer upon request, § 31-33-7.

Appointment and powers of county police, T. 36, C. 8.

Powers and duties of investigators for state examining boards and office of joint-secretary, §

43-1-5

.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 1204), the General Assembly urged certain public organizations and state agencies to develop programs for the education and training of social services and criminal justice professionals in the areas of child abuse, sexual abuse, and sexual exploitation.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Regulations governing the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, Chapter 464-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Symposium Protect and Serve:
Perspectives on 21st Century Policing January 20, 2017:
State Labor Law and Federal Police Reform,” see 51 Ga. L. Rev. 1209 (2017).

For article, “Symposium Protect and Serve:
Perspectives on 21st Century Policing January 20, 2017:
Youth/Police Encounters on Chicago’s South Side:
Acknowledging the Realities,” see 51 Ga. L. Rev. 1079 (2017).

For article, “Symposium Protect and Serve:
Perspectives on 21st Century Policing January 20, 2017:
Commodifying Policing:
A Recipe for Community-Police Tensions,” see 51 Ga. L. Rev. 1047 (2017).

For article, “Symposium Protect and Serve:
Perspectives on 21st Century Policing January 20, 2017:
The Problematic Prosecution of an Asian American Police Officer: Notes: From a Participant in People v. Peter Liang,” see 51 Ga. L. Rev. 1023 (2017).

For article, “Symposium Protect and Serve:
Perspectives on 21st Century Policing January 20, 2017:
Keynote Address,” see 51 Ga. L. Rev. 981 (2017).

For article, “Missing Police Body Camera Videos:
Remedies, Evidentiary Fairness, and Automatic Activation,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 57 (2017).

For article, “Assessing the Impact of Police Body Camera Evidence on the Litigation of Excessive Force Cases,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (2019).

For article, “Violent Videos:
Criminal Defense in a Digital Age,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 305 (2021).

35-8-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of labor and employment law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 251 (2005); 58 Mercer L. Rev. 211 (2006).

35-8-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Applicant” means a prospective peace officer who has not commenced employment or service with a law enforcement unit.

“Candidate” means a peace officer who, having satisfied preemployment requirements, has commenced employment with a law enforcement unit but who has not satisfied the training requirement provided for in this chapter.

“Council” means the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council.

“Department head” means the chief executive or head of a state department or agency, a county, a municipality, or a railroad who is a peace officer and whose responsibilities include the supervision and assignment of one or more employees or the performance of administrative and managerial duties of a police agency or law enforcement unit. Such term does not include the Attorney General, the director of the Georgia Drugs and Narcotics Agency, a district attorney, a solicitor-general, a county or municipal fire chief, or peace officers employed exclusively as investigators of any such offices who do not exercise any law enforcement supervisory or managerial duties. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to any sheriff or to any head of any law enforcement unit within the office of sheriff.

(4.1)

“Detention facility” means a municipal or county jail used for the detention of persons charged with or convicted of a felony, a misdemeanor, or a municipal or county ordinance, but shall not include a facility customarily used to hold one or more persons for a period not to exceed eight hours while any such person awaits processing, booking, court appearance, or release.

“Emergency peace officers” means any peace officers who are employed or appointed to act as peace officers during an emergency or disaster which has been so declared by the chief executive officer of the state and whose status as peace officers is intended to be temporary and for that limited purpose.

(5.1)

“Jail officer” means any person who is employed or appointed by a county or a municipality and who has the responsibility of supervising inmates who are confined in a municipal or county detention facility.

(5.2)

“Juvenile correctional facility” means a facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice and used for the detention of youth who are delinquent or who are alleged to be delinquent or a facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice used for the care, treatment, and rehabilitation of juvenile offenders.

(5.3)

“Juvenile correctional officer” means any person employed or appointed by the Department of Juvenile Justice who has the primary responsibility for the supervision and control of youth confined in its programs and facilities.

“Law enforcement support personnel” means persons, other than peace officers, whose primary employment with a law enforcement unit consists of performing functions directly related to the prevention, detection, or investigation of crime.

“Law enforcement unit” means:

Any agency, organ, or department of this state, a subdivision or municipality thereof, or a railroad whose primary functions include the enforcement of criminal or traffic laws, the preservation of public order, the protection of life and property, or the prevention, detection, or investigation of crime;

The Office of Permits and Enforcement of the Department of Transportation, the Department of Juvenile Justice and its institutions and facilities for the purpose of personnel who are authorized to exercise the power of arrest and who are employed or appointed by such department or institutions, and the office or section in the Department of Juvenile Justice in which persons are assigned who have been designated by the commissioner to investigate and apprehend delinquent children and any child with a pending juvenile court case alleging the child to be a child in need of services; and

The Department of Corrections, the Department of Community Supervision, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, municipal correctional institutions employing 300 or more correctional officers, and county correctional institutions for the purpose of personnel who are authorized to exercise the power of arrest and who are employed or appointed by such department, board, or institutions.

“Peace officer” means, for purposes of this chapter only:

An agent, operative, or officer of this state, a subdivision or municipality thereof, or a railroad who, as an employee for hire or as a volunteer, is vested either expressly by law or by virtue of public employment or service with authority to enforce the criminal or traffic laws through the power of arrest and whose duties include the preservation of public order, the protection of life and property, and the prevention, detection, or investigation of crime;

An enforcement officer who is employed by the Department of Transportation in its Office of Permits and Enforcement and any person employed by the Department of Juvenile Justice who is designated by the commissioner to investigate and apprehend delinquent children and any child with a pending juvenile court case alleging the child to be a child in need of services;

(B.1)

Personnel who are authorized to exercise the power of arrest, who are employed or appointed by the Department of Juvenile Justice, and whose full-time duties include the preservation of public order, the protection of life and property, the detection of crime, the supervision of delinquent children in the department’s institutions, facilities, or programs, or the supervision of delinquent children under intensive supervision in the community;

Personnel who are authorized to exercise the power of arrest and who are employed or appointed by the Department of Corrections, the Department of Community Supervision, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, municipal correctional institutions employing 300 or more correctional officers, county probation systems, and county correctional institutions; and

An administrative investigator who is an agent, operative, investigator, or officer of this state whose duties include the prevention, detection, and investigation of violations of law and the enforcement of administrative, regulatory, licensing, or certification requirements of his or her respective employing agency.

Law enforcement support personnel are not peace officers within the meaning of this chapter, but they may be certified upon voluntarily complying with the certification provisions of this chapter.

(8.1)

“Requesting entity” means any law enforcement agency or other entity within this state empowered by law to maintain a law enforcement unit.

(8.2)

“Retired correctional officer” means any retired correctional officer certified by the council.

“Retired peace officer” means a retired law enforcement officer who, prior to his or her retirement from service with the state or a subdivision or municipality thereof, was a peace officer within the meaning of such term as defined in paragraph (8) of this Code section. A retired peace officer may be certified or registered upon voluntarily complying with the certification or registration provisions of this chapter. Such term shall also mean a retired law enforcement officer who retired from service with the United States who meets all criteria as specified by the council for such classification; provided, however, that such classification shall not exempt such officer from satisfying the minimum employment and training requirements of this chapter if such officer is appointed or employed as a peace officer by the state or a subdivision or municipality thereof.

“School” means any school, college, university, academy, or training program approved by the council which offers basic law enforcement training and which consists of a combination of a course curriculum, instructors, and facilities.

(10.1)

“School resource officer” means a peace officer whose primary employment or assigned duties with a law enforcement unit is assignment or appointment to a public elementary school or secondary school.

“Speed detection device” means that particular device designed to measure the speed or velocity of a motor vehicle and marketed under the name “Vascar,” any device designed to measure the speed or velocity of motor vehicles using the Doppler principle of radio detection and ranging and commonly marketed under the name “radar,” or any similar device, including but not limited to laser, operating under the same or similar principle, which device is approved by the Department of Public Safety for the measurement of speed, including any device for the measurement of speed or velocity based upon the Doppler principle of radar or speed timing principle of laser.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, §§ 2, 14; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, §§ 2, 3, 10; Ga. L. 1976, p. 395, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1978, p. 992, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2299, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 979, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 778, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2478, §§ 1, 2, 5, 6; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1141, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35; Ga. L. 1993, p. 966, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 880, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1238, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1281, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 582, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, §§ 2A, 2B, 7A, 7B; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 35; Ga. L. 1998, p. 224, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 777, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 35/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-45/HB 242; Ga. L. 2014, p. 382, § 1/SB 324; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-56/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 673, § 1-1/SB 149; Ga. L. 2020, p. 481, § 1/SB 341.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added paragraph (10.1).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added paragraphs (8.1) and (8.2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “Department of Juvenile Justice” was substituted for “Department of Children and Youth Services” in subparagraph (8)(B).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act shall apply to sentences entered on or after July 1, 2015.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Definitions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, Sec. 464-2-.01.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For review of 1996 use of radar speed detection devices legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 244 (1996).

35-8-3.
Establishment of Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council; membership; organization; administrative assignment to Department of Public Safety.

The Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council is established. The council shall consist of 22 voting members and five advisory members.

The voting members shall consist of:

An appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General, the commissioner of public safety or his or her designee, the director of investigation of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation or his or her designee, the president of the Georgia Association of Chiefs of Police or his or her designee, the president of the Georgia Sheriffs Association or his or her designee, the president of the Georgia Municipal Association or his or her designee, the president of the Association County Commissioners of Georgia or his or her designee, the president of the Peace Officers’ Association of Georgia or his or her designee, the commissioner of corrections or his or her designee, the commissioner of community supervision or his or her designee, the chairperson of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles or his or her designee, the president of the Georgia Prison Wardens Association or his or her designee, the commissioner of juvenile justice or his or her designee, and the commissioner of natural resources or his or her designee, who shall be ex officio members of the council;

Six members who shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four years, their initial appointments, however, being two for four-year terms, two for three-year terms, and two for two-year terms. Appointments shall be made so that there are always on the council the following persons who are appointed by the Governor: one chief of police; two municipal police officers other than a chief of police; one county sheriff; one city manager or mayor; and one county commissioner. No person shall serve beyond the time he or she holds the office or employment by reason of which he or she was initially eligible for appointment. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, and successors shall serve for the unexpired term. Any member may be appointed for additional terms; and

Two members who are peace officers and who shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four years. Neither person shall serve beyond the time he or she is actively employed or serves as a peace officer. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, and successors shall serve for the unexpired term.

Five advisory members shall be appointed by the council to serve on the council in an advisory capacity only without voting privileges.

Membership on the council does not constitute public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his or her membership.

The council is assigned to the Department of Public Safety for administrative purposes only, as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 866, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1606; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 395, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1684, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 717, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2478, §§ 3, 7, 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 26; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-57/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 247, § 1/SB 279.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a second “the” preceding “time he” was deleted in the second sentence of paragraph (b)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act shall apply to sentences entered on or after July 1, 2015.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

35-8-4.
Officers of council; quorum; minutes of meetings and records; reports to Governor and General Assembly.

The business of the council shall be conducted in the following manner:

The officers of the council, who shall consist of a chairperson, vice chairperson, and secretary-treasurer, shall be elected at the first meeting of each calendar year.

Eleven members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The council shall maintain minutes of its meetings and such other records as it deems necessary.

The council shall report at least annually to the Governor and to the General Assembly as to its activities.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 4; Ga. L. 2018, p. 336, § 1/HB 867.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “chairperson, vice chairperson” for “chairman, vice-chair-man” in paragraph (1); and substituted “Eleven” for “Seven” at the beginning of paragraph (2).

35-8-5.
Compensation of members of council.

The members of the council shall receive no salary but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 5.

35-8-6.
Appointment of executive director of council; contracts for services; personnel; investigators; subpoenas; funding; gifts, grants, or donations.

The council may appoint an executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the council. The council shall establish the compensation for the executive director.

The executive director may contract for such services as may be necessary and authorized in order to carry out the provisions of this chapter and may employ such other professional, technical, and clerical personnel deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The executive director is authorized to appoint certain investigators for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The executive director and persons so appointed shall meet all employment and training requirements of this chapter as for all other peace officers and shall have all of the powers of other peace officers. Any investigator of the council shall have access to and may examine any writing, document, or other material which is deemed by the chairperson of the council to be related to the fitness of any peace officer or applicant to practice as a peace officer. The chairperson or executive director of the council may issue subpoenas to compel such access. When a subpoena is disobeyed, the council may apply to the superior court of the county where the person to whom the subpoena is issued resides for an order requiring obedience. Failure to comply with such order shall be punishable as for contempt of court.

Investigators provided for under subsection (c) of this Code section may retain their weapon and badge upon retirement pursuant to the requirements and procedures provided for under Code Section 35-1-20.

The funds necessary to carry out this chapter shall come from the funds appropriated to and available to the council and from any other available funds.

The council is authorized to accept and use gifts, grants, donations, property, both real and personal, and services for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

Any funds, property, or services received as gifts, grants, or donations shall be kept separate and apart from any funds appropriated to the council; and the funds, property, or services so received by gifts, grants, or donations shall be the property and funds of the council and, as such, shall not lapse at the end of each fiscal year but shall remain under the control of and subject to the direction of the council for carrying out this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 7; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 483, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 514, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 336, § 2/HB 867.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “chairperson” for “chairman” in the third and fourth sentences of subsection (c); added subsection (d); and redesignated former subsections (d) through (f) as present subsections (e) through (g), respectively.

35-8-7.
Powers and duties of council generally.

The council is vested with the following powers and duties:

To meet at such times and places as it may deem necessary;

To contract with other agencies, public or private, or persons as it deems necessary for the rendering and affording of such services, facilities, studies, and reports to the council as will best assist it to carry out its duties and responsibilities;

To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of every department, agency, or instrumentality in the state government or its political subdivisions in the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter;

To establish criteria to be used in certifying schools authorized to conduct training required by this chapter;

To certify schools as authorized to conduct training required by this chapter;

To prescribe minimum qualifications for directors of schools certified to conduct training required by this chapter;

To certify such school directors;

To establish minimum qualifications for instructors at schools certified to conduct training required by this chapter;

To certify instructors authorized to conduct training required by this chapter;

To reevaluate certified schools annually to determine if such schools shall continue to be certified;

To withdraw or suspend certification of schools, school directors, and instructors who fail to continue to meet or maintain, at any given time, the criteria and qualifications required for school, school director, or instructor certification;

To determine whether a candidate has met the requirements of this chapter and is qualified to be employed as a peace officer and to issue a certificate to those so qualified;

To certify to designated law enforcement units a candidate’s successful completion of the course;

To refuse to grant a certificate to or to discipline a certified peace officer or an exempt peace officer under this chapter or any antecedent law;

To establish and modify the curriculum, including the methods of instruction, composing the basic training courses and to set the minimum number of hours therefor;

To establish and recommend curricula for such advanced, in-service, and specialized training courses as the council shall deem advisable and to recognize the completion of such courses by the issuance of certificates;

To provide technical assistance as requested by law enforcement units;

To provide for and administer the registration of all exempt peace officers;

To research, plan, and establish policy relative to peace officer training and to develop and coordinate the delivery of peace officer training programs through such agencies and institutions as the council may deem appropriate;

To establish as part of the curriculum for basic and in-service training courses for all peace officers training on organized criminal activity and criminal street gangs;

To develop, adopt, and issue advanced or professional peace officer certificates based upon the attainment of specified education, advanced or specialized training, and experience as the council may determine;

To provide and administer the certification of persons qualified to operate radar speed detection devices and to withdraw or suspend such certificates as provided for in this chapter;

To impose administrative fees, as determined by the council, for services provided pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

To adopt in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and

To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it to perform wholly and adequately its duties and to exercise the power granted to it.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 208, § 6; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1165, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 395, § 7; Ga. L. 1977, p. 713, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1680, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 979, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 539, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1488, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 270, § 12; Ga. L. 2010, p. 212, § 1/SB 324.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 212, § 2/SB 324, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing contained in this Act shall be construed so as to suggest that any administrative fees that may have been collected by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council prior to this Act’s enactment were collected without authority. Nor shall this Act be construed so as to create in any person paying administrative fees prior to the effective date of this Act a cause of action for the payment of such fees.” This Act became effective May 20, 2010.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administration of Council, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, § 464-1-.01.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to crimes and offenses, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 80 (1998).

35-8-7.1.
Authority of council to refuse certificate to applicant or to discipline council certified officer or exempt officer; grounds; restoration of certificate; emergency suspension of certification; notice of investigation; retention of records.

The council shall have authority to refuse to grant a certificate to an applicant or to discipline a council certified officer or exempt officer under this chapter or any antecedent law upon a determination by the council that the applicant, council certified officer, or exempt officer has:

Failed to demonstrate the qualifications or standards for a certificate provided in this chapter or in the rules and regulations of the council. It shall be incumbent upon the applicant to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the council that he or she meets all requirements for the issuance of a certificate;

Knowingly made misleading, deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent representations in the practice of being an officer or in any document connected therewith or practiced fraud or deceit or intentionally made any false statement in obtaining a certificate to practice as an officer;

Been convicted of a felony in the courts of this state or any other state, territory, country, or of the United States. As used in this paragraph, the term “conviction of a felony” shall include a conviction of an offense which if committed in this state would be deemed a felony under either state or federal law without regard to its designation elsewhere. As used in this paragraph, the term “conviction” shall include a finding or a verdict of guilt, a plea of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere in a criminal proceeding, regardless of whether the adjudication of guilt or sentence is withheld or not entered thereon. However, the council may not deny a certificate to an applicant with a conviction if the adjudication of guilt or sentence is withheld or not entered thereon;

Committed a crime involving moral turpitude, without regard to conviction. The conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude shall be conclusive of the commission of such crime. As used in this paragraph, the term “conviction” shall have the meaning prescribed in paragraph (3) of this subsection;

Had his or her certificate or license to practice as an officer revoked, suspended, or annulled by any lawful certifying or licensing authority; had other disciplinary action taken against him or her by any lawful certifying or licensing authority; or was denied a certificate or license by any lawful certifying or licensing authority;

Engaged in any unprofessional, unethical, deceptive, or deleterious conduct or practice harmful to the public; such conduct or practice need not have resulted in actual injury to any person. As used in this paragraph, the term “unprofessional conduct” shall include any departure from, or failure to conform to, the minimal standards of acceptable and prevailing practice of an officer;

Violated or attempted to violate a law, rule, or regulation of this state, any other state, the council, the United States, or any other lawful authority without regard to whether the violation is criminally punishable, so long as such law, rule, or regulation relates to or in part regulates the practice of an officer;

Committed any act or omission which is indicative of bad moral character or untrustworthiness;

Been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction, within or outside this state;

Become unable to perform as an officer with reasonable skill and safety to citizens by reason of illness or use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material or as a result of any mental or physical condition; or

Been suspended or discharged by the officer’s employing law enforcement unit for disciplinary reasons.

When the council finds that any person is unqualified to be granted a certificate or finds that any person should be disciplined pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the council may take any one or more of the following actions:

Refuse to grant a certificate to an applicant;

Administer a public or private reprimand, provided that a private reprimand shall not be disclosed to any person except the officer;

Suspend any certificate for a definite period;

Limit or restrict any certificate;

Revoke any certificate; or

Condition the penalty, or withhold formal disposition, upon the officer’s completing such care, counseling, or treatment, as directed by the council.

In addition to and in conjunction with the foregoing actions, the council may make a finding adverse to the applicant or officer but withhold imposition of judgment and penalty or it may impose the judgment and penalty but suspend enforcement thereof and place the officer on probation, which may be vacated upon noncompliance with such reasonable terms as the council may impose.

In its discretion, the council may restore and reissue a certificate issued under this chapter or any antecedent law to an officer and, as a condition thereof, may impose any disciplinary or corrective measure provided in this chapter.

Upon arrest or indictment of an officer for any crime which is punishable as a felony, the executive director of the council shall order the emergency suspension of such officer’s certification upon the executive director’s determination that the suspension is in the best interest of the health, safety, or welfare of the public. The order of emergency suspension shall be made in writing and shall specify the basis for the executive director’s determination. Following the issuance of an emergency suspension order, proceedings of the council in the exercise of its authority to discipline any officer shall be promptly scheduled as provided for in Code Section 35-8-7.2. The emergency suspension order of the executive director shall continue in effect until issuance of the final decision of the council or such order is withdrawn by the executive director.

Upon initiating an investigation of an officer for possible disciplinary action or upon disciplining an officer pursuant to this Code section, the council shall notify the head of the law enforcement agency that employs such officer of the investigation or disciplinary action. In the case of an investigation, it shall be sufficient to identify the officer and state that a disciplinary investigation has been opened. Notice of the initiation of an investigation shall be sent by priority mail. If the investigation is completed without any further action, notice of the termination of such investigation shall also be provided to the head of the employing agency. In the case of disciplinary action, the notice shall identify the officer and state the nature of the disciplinary action taken. The notice of disposition shall be sent only after the action of the council is deemed final. Such notice shall be sent by priority mail.

If the certification of an officer is suspended or revoked by either the executive director or council, then the council shall notify the head of the law enforcement agency that employs the officer; the district attorney of the judicial circuit in which such law enforcement agency is located; and the solicitor of the state court, if any, of the county in which such law enforcement agency is located. It shall be sufficient for this notice to identify the officer and state the length of time, if known, that the officer will not have powers of arrest. Such notice shall be sent by priority mail.

Notwithstanding Article 5 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, records of an investigation of an officer by the council, including, but not limited to, records used to investigate complaints against an officer and polygraph case files containing official polygraph reports, shall be retained for 30 years following the date that such investigation is deemed concluded by the council and then such records may be destroyed; provided, however, that the council shall have the authority to destroy such records prior to such 30 years where such officer is deceased and no action upon the complaint was taken by the council beyond the council’s initial intake of such complaint.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 539, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35; Ga. L. 2008, p. 237, § 1/SB 373; Ga. L. 2011, p. 506, § 1/HB 203; Ga. L. 2013, p. 864, § 1/HB 366; Ga. L. 2019, p. 305, § 1/HB 325.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (g).

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

35-8-7.2.
Administrative procedure; hearings; review.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, proceedings of the council in the exercise of its authority to issue any certificate or discipline any peace officer under the terms of this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” In all such proceedings the council shall have authority to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any book, writing, or document upon the issuance of a subpoena therefor. In any hearing in which the fitness of a peace officer or applicant is in question, the council may exclude all persons from its deliberation of the appropriate action and may, when it deems necessary, speak to the peace officer or applicant in private. All final determinations, findings, and conclusions of the council under this chapter are final and conclusive decisions of the matters involved.

Proceedings for review of a final decision of the council shall be instituted by filing a petition within 30 days after the service of the final decision of the council or, if a rehearing is requested, within 30 days after the decision thereon. The petition shall be filed in the superior court of the county of residence of the petitioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-7.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 539, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “superior court” was substituted for “Superior Court” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

35-8-7.3.
Civil suits by peace officers.

A peace officer shall have the right to bring a civil suit against any person, group of persons, organization, or corporation, or the head of an organization or corporation, for damages, either pecuniary or otherwise, suffered during the officer’s performance of official duties, for abridgment of the officer’s civil rights arising out of the officer’s performance of official duties, or for filing a complaint against the officer which the person knew was false when it was filed.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-7.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 671, § 5/HB 838.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

35-8-7.4.
Bias motivated intimidation of first responders; prosecution and penalty.

As used in this Code section, the term “first responder” means any firefighter of a municipal, county, or volunteer fire department, a peace officer as defined in Code Section 35-8-2, and an emergency medical technician as defined in Code Section 16-10-24.2.

A person commits the offense of bias motivated intimidation when such person maliciously and with the specific intent to intimidate, harass, or terrorize another person because of that person’s actual or perceived employment as a first responder:

Causes death or serious bodily harm to another person; or

Causes damage to or destroys any real or personal property of a person because of actual or perceived employment as a first responder without permission and the amount of the damage exceeds $500.00 or the value of the property destroyed exceeds $500.00.

Any person that violates subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of the offense of bias motivated intimidation and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment of not less than one nor more than five years, a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.

Each violation of this Code section shall constitute a separate offense and shall not merge with any other crime.

A sentence imposed under this Code section shall run consecutively to any sentence for any other offense related to the act or acts establishing an offense under this Code section.

Charges of violating subsection (b) of this Code section shall not be prosecuted by way of an accusation but only by indictment or special presentment by a grand jury.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-8-7.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 671, § 6/HB 838.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.